Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-235
Violation; civil penalty.

Any person who violates the Telemarketing and Prize Promotions Act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each violation. The Attorney General, acting in the name of the state, may seek recovery of such civil penalties in a civil action.

Laws 2001, LB 165, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2014;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 97.